Utah statutes.
72-10-409.   Airport zoning regulations -- Administration and enforcement.

(1) (a)  All airport zoning regulations adopted under this part shall provide for the administration and enforcement of the regulations by an administrative agency which may be an agency created by the regulations or any official, board, or other existing agency of the political subdivision adopting the regulations or of one of the political subdivisions which participated in the creation of the joint airport zoning board adopting the regulations, if satisfactory to that political subdivision.

(b)  The administrative agency may not be or include any member of the board of adjustment.

(2)  The duties of any administrative agency designated pursuant to this part shall include that of hearing and deciding all permits under Subsection 72-10-407(1), but the agency may not have or exercise any of the powers delegated to the board of adjustment.

